Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1217YH (8) 91 jm/js H.F. 752 Section 1. Section 331.752, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. The resolution changing the status of a county attorney 3 shall state the initial annual salary to be paid to the county 4 attorney when the full-time or part-time status is effective. 5 The annual salary specified in the resolution shall remain 6 effective until changed as provided in section 331.907 . Except 7 in counties having a population of more than two hundred 8 thousand, the annual salary of a full-time county attorney 9 shall be an amount which is between forty-five percent and one 10 hundred percent of the annual salary received by a district 11 court judge. 12 Sec. 2. Section 331.757, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. The county attorney may appoint, with the approval of 15 the board, an assistant county attorney to serve as a full-time 16 prosecutor. A full-time prosecutor shall refrain from the 17 private practice of law. The county attorney shall determine 18 the compensation paid to a full-time prosecutor within the 19 budget set for the county attorneyâs office by the board. 20 Except in counties having a population of more than two hundred 21 thousand, the annual salary of an assistant county attorney 22 shall not exceed eighty-five percent of the maximum annual 23 salary of a full-time county attorney. 24 Sec. 3. Section 331.904, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. The annual base salary of the first and second deputy 27 officer of the office of auditor, treasurer, and recorder, the 28 deputy in charge of elections administration, the deputy in 29 charge of the motor vehicle registration and title division, 30 and the deputy in charge of driverâs license issuance shall 31 each be an amount not to exceed eighty-five percent of the 32 annual salary of the deputyâs principal officer. In offices 33 where more than two deputies are required, the annual base 34 salary of each additional deputy shall be an amount not to 35 -1- LSB 1217YH (8) 91 jm/js 1/ 4 H.F. 752 exceed eighty percent of the principal officerâs salary. The 1 amount of the annual base salary of each deputy shall be 2 certified by the principal officer to the board and, if a 3 deputyâs annual base salary does not exceed the limitations 4 specified in this subsection , the board shall certify the 5 annual base salary to the auditor. The board shall not certify 6 a deputyâs annual base salary which exceeds the limitations of 7 this subsection set by the auditor, treasurer, or recorder, or 8 principal officer, as applicable . The board shall certify the 9 annual base salary to the auditor. 10 Sec. 4. Section 331.904, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 2. Each deputy sheriff shall receive an annual base salary 13 as follows: 14 a. The annual base salary of a first or second deputy 15 sheriff shall not exceed eighty-five percent of the annual base 16 salary of the sheriff. 17 b. The annual base salary of any other deputy sheriff shall 18 not exceed the annual base salary of the first or second deputy 19 sheriff. 20 c. 2. a. The sheriff shall set the annual base salary 21 of each deputy sheriff who is classified as exempt under the 22 federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, subject 23 to the limitations specified in paragraphs âaâ and âbâ . The 24 sheriff shall certify the annual base salaries of the exempt 25 deputy sheriffs to the board , and , if the limitations of 26 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ are not exceeded, the board shall certify 27 the annual base salaries to the county auditor. 28 d. b. The board shall set the annual base salaries of any 29 deputy sheriffs who are not classified as exempt under the 30 federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended. Upon 31 certification by the sheriff, the board shall review, and may 32 modify, the annual base salaries of the deputy sheriffs who are 33 not classified as exempt. The annual base salaries set by the 34 board are subject to the limitations specified in paragraphs 35 -2- LSB 1217YH (8) 91 jm/js 2/ 4 H.F. 752 âaâ and âbâ . 1 e. c. As used in this subsection , âbase salaryâ means the 2 basic compensation excluding overtime pay, longevity pay, shift 3 differential pay, or other supplement pay and fringe benefits. 4 Sec. 5. Section 331.904, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 3. The annual salary of each assistant county attorney 7 shall be determined by the county attorney within the budget 8 set for the county attorneyâs office by the board. The salary 9 of an assistant county attorney shall not exceed eighty-five 10 percent of the maximum salary of a full-time county attorney. 11 The county attorney shall inform the board of the full-time 12 or part-time status of each assistant county attorney. In 13 the case of a part-time assistant county attorney, the county 14 attorney shall inform the board of the approximate number of 15 hours per week the assistant county attorney shall devote to 16 official duties. 17 Sec. 6. Section 331.907, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 2. At the public hearing held on the county budget as 20 provided in section 331.434 , the county compensation board 21 shall submit its recommended compensation schedule for the 22 next fiscal year to the board of supervisors for inclusion 23 in the county budget. The board of supervisors shall review 24 the recommended compensation schedule for the elected county 25 officers and determine the final compensation schedule. In 26 determining the final compensation schedule for the elected 27 county officers, the board of supervisors may set compensation 28 at less than the compensation provided in the current 29 compensation schedule if the position is reduced to part-time 30 under the recommended compensation schedule. Additionally, the 31 board of supervisors may reduce the amount of salary increase 32 proposed for an individual elected county officer without 33 reducing the amount of increase proposed for the other elected 34 county officers by an equal amount if the board of supervisors 35 -3- LSB 1217YH (8) 91 jm/js 3/ 4 H.F. 752 provides justification. A copy of the final compensation 1 schedule shall be filed with the county budget at the office 2 of the director of the department of management. The final 3 compensation schedule takes effect on July 1 following 4 its adoption by the board of supervisors. For purposes of 5 this subsection , âcurrent compensation scheduleâ means the 6 compensation schedule in effect when the board of supervisors 7 considers the recommended compensation schedule. 8